New York, session 2025-2026, A9270.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Item (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph 4 of subsection 2 (a) of section 3216 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 219 of 3 the laws of 2011, is amended and a new subparagraph (iv) is added to 4 read as follows: 5 (iii) Any married or unmarried child shall be considered a dependent 6 child until attaining age twenty-six without regard to financial depend- 7 ence, residency with the policyholder, student status, or employment, 8 for a policy of hospital, medical, surgical, or prescription drug 9 expense insurance[.]; or 10 (iv) Any unmarried child who is not eligible for employer-sponsored 11 health care, not enrolled in Medicare, and who lives, works or resides 12 in New York state or the service area of the insurer shall be considered 13 a dependent child until attaining age twenty-nine without regard to 14 financial dependence, residency with the policyholder, student status, 15 or employment, for a policy of hospital, medical, surgical, or 16 prescription drug expense insurance. 17 § 2. Clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph 1 of subsection (f) 18 of section 4235 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 219 of the 19 laws of 2011, is amended and a new clause (i-a) is added to read as 20 follows: 21 (i) a policy of hospital, medical, surgical, or prescription drug 22 expense insurance that provides coverage for children shall provide such 23 coverage to a married or unmarried child until attainment of age twen- 24 ty-six, without regard to financial dependence, residency with the 25 employee or member, student status, or employment, except a policy that EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14021-01-5 A. 9270 2 1 is a grandfathered health plan may, for plan years beginning before 2 January first, two thousand fourteen, exclude coverage of an adult child 3 under age twenty-six who is eligible to enroll in an employer-sponsored 4 health plan other than a group health plan of a parent. For purposes of 5 this [item] clause, "grandfathered health plan" means coverage provided 6 by an insurer in which an individual was enrolled on March twenty-third, 7 two thousand ten for as long as the coverage maintains grandfathered 8 status in accordance with section 1251(e) of the Affordable Care Act, 42 9 U.S.C. § 18011(e); [and] 10 (i-a) a policy of hospital, medical, surgical, or prescription drug 11 expense insurance that provides coverage for children shall provide such 12 coverage to an unmarried child who is not eligible for employer-spon- 13 sored health care, not enrolled in Medicare, and who lives, works or 14 resides in New York state or the service area of the insurer until 15 attainment of age twenty-nine without regard to financial dependence, 16 residency with the employee or member, student status, or employment; 17 and 18 § 3. Item (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph 1 of subsection (d) of 19 section 4304 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 219 of the laws 20 of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 21 (i) A "family contract" may provide coverage to any child or children 22 not over nineteen years of age, provided that an unmarried student at an 23 accredited institution of learning may be considered a dependent until 24 the child becomes twenty-three years of age, and provided also that the 25 coverage of any such "family contract" may include, at the option of the 26 corporation, any unmarried child until attaining age twenty-five. 27 However, a "family contract" of hospital, medical, surgical, or 28 prescription drug expense insurance that provides coverage for dependent 29 children shall provide such coverage to a married or unmarried child 30 until attainment of age twenty-six without regard to financial depend- 31 ence, residency with the contract holder, student status, or employment. 32 Provided further, however, a "family contract" of hospital, medical, 33 surgical, or prescription drug expense insurance that provides coverage 34 for dependent children shall provide such coverage to an unmarried child 35 who is not eligible for employer-sponsored health care, not enrolled in 36 Medicare, and who lives, works or resides in New York state or the 37 service area of the corporation until attainment of age twenty-nine 38 without regard to financial dependence, residency with the contract 39 holder, student status, or employment. 40 § 4. Item (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph 1 of subsection (c) of 41 section 4305 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 219 of the laws 42 of 2011, is amended and a new item (i-a) is added to read as follows: 43 (i) a contract of hospital, medical, surgical, or prescription drug 44 expense insurance that provides coverage for children shall provide such 45 coverage to a married or unmarried child until attainment of age twen- 46 ty-six, without regard to financial dependence, residency with the 47 member, student status, or employment, except a contract that is a 48 grandfathered health plan may, for plan years beginning before January 49 first, two thousand fourteen, exclude coverage of an adult child under 50 age twenty-six who is eligible to enroll in an employer-sponsored health 51 plan other than a group health plan of a parent. For purposes of this 52 item, "grandfathered health plan" means coverage provided by a corpo- 53 ration in which an individual was enrolled on March twenty-third, two 54 thousand ten for as long as the coverage maintains grandfathered status 55 in accordance with section 1251(e) of the Affordable Care Act, 42 U.S.C. 56 § 18011(e); [and] A. 9270 3 1 (i-a) a contract of hospital, medical, surgical, or prescription drug 2 expense insurance that provides coverage for children shall provide such 3 coverage to an unmarried child who is not eligible for employer-spon- 4 sored health care, not enrolled in Medicare, and who lives, works or 5 resides in New York state or the service area of the corporation until 6 attainment of age twenty-nine without regard to financial dependence, 7 residency with the contract holder, student status, or employment; and 8 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 9 policies and contracts entered into, renewed, modified or amended on or 10 after such effective date.